Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 2. Processing Cooperative

§ 17-10-201.
Title.

This act may be cited as the “Wyoming Processing Cooperative law.”

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §

17-10-202

(a)(xix).

§ 17-10-202.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Address” means mailing address, including a zip code. In the case of a registered address, the term means the mailing address and the actual office location, which may not be a post office box;

“Articles” means the articles of organization of a cooperative as originally filed and subsequently amended;

“Association” means an organization conducting business on a cooperative plan under the laws of this state or another state that is chartered to conduct business under other laws of this state or another state;

“Board” means the board of directors of a cooperative;

“Business entity” means a company, limited liability company, limited liability partnership or other legal entity, whether domestic or foreign, association or body vested with the power or function of a legal entity;

“Cooperative” means an association organized under this article conducting business on a cooperative plan as provided under this article;

“Domestic business entity” means a business entity organized under the laws of this state;

“Filed with the secretary of state” means that a document meeting the applicable requirements of this article, signed and accompanied by the required filing fee, has been delivered to the secretary of state of this state. The secretary of state shall endorse on the document the word “Filed” or a similar word determined by the secretary of state and the month, day, and year of filing, record the document in the office of the secretary of state, and return a document to the person or entity who delivered it for filing;

“Foreign business entity” means a business entity that is not a domestic business entity;

“Member” means a person or entity reflected on the books of the cooperative as the owner of governance rights of a membership interest of the cooperative and includes patron and nonpatron members;

“Membership interest” means a member’s interest in a cooperative consisting of a member’s financial rights, a member’s right to assign financial rights, a member’s governance rights and a member’s right to assign governance rights. Membership interest includes patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests;

“Members’ meeting” means a regular or special members’ meeting;

“Nonpatron membership interest” means a membership interest that does not require the holder to conduct patronage business for or with the cooperative to receive financial rights or distributions;

“Patron” means a person or entity who conducts patronage business with the cooperative;

“Patronage” means business, transactions, or services done for or with the cooperative as defined by the cooperative;

“Patron member” means a member holding a patron membership interest;

“Patron membership interest” means the membership interest requiring the holder to conduct patronage business for or with the cooperative, as specified by the cooperative to receive financial rights or distributions;

“Signed” means that the signature of a person has been written on a document, and, with respect to a document required by this article to be filed with the secretary of state, means that the document has been signed by a person authorized to do so by this article, the articles or bylaws, or by a resolution approved by the directors or the members. A signature on a document may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile or electronically or in any other manner reproduced on the document;

“The act” means W.S.

17-10-201

through

17-10-253

.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-10-203.
Filing fee; rules and regulations; annual reports and license taxes.

Unless otherwise provided, the filing fee for documents filed under this article with the secretary of state shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

17-16-122

. The secretary of state shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

The provisions of W.S.

17-16-1630

regarding the filing of reports, license taxes and records shall apply to cooperatives formed under this article.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-204.
Registered agent; change of registered office or registered agent.

Each cooperative shall have and continuously maintain in this state:

A registered office as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

;

A registered agent as provided in W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

.

through (d) Repealed by 2008 Laws ch. 90, § 3.

If any cooperative has failed for thirty (30) days to appoint and maintain a registered agent in this state, or has failed for thirty (30) days after change of its registered office or registered agent to file in the office of the secretary of state a statement of the change it shall be deemed to be transacting business within this state without authority and to have forfeited any franchises, rights or privileges acquired under the laws thereof and the forfeiture shall be made effective in the following manner. The secretary of state shall provide by first class mail or by electronic means a notice of its failure to comply with aforesaid provisions. Unless compliance is made within thirty (30) days of mailing or electronic submission of the notice, the cooperative shall be deemed defunct and to have forfeited its certificate of organization acquired under the laws of this state. Provided, that any defunct cooperative may at any time within two (2) years after the forfeiture of its certificate, in the manner herein provided, be revived and reinstated, by filing the necessary statement under this act and paying a reinstatement fee established by the secretary of state by rule, together with a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100.00). The reinstatement fee shall not exceed the costs of providing the reinstatement service. The cooperative shall retain its registered name during the two (2) year reinstatement period under this section.

The provisions of W.S.

17-28-101

through

17-28-111

shall apply to all cooperatives.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2; 2008, ch. 90, §§ 2, 3; 2017 ch. 86, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2021 ch. 21, § 2, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (e), substituted “first class mail, or by electronic means if the cooperative has consented to receive notices electronically” for “certified mail” in the second sentence, and substituted “mailing or electronic submission of the notice” for “the delivery of notice” in the third sentence.

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, in the second sentence (e), substituted "provide" for "mail," deleted "if the cooperative has consented to receive notices electronically" following "electronic means" and made related changes.

Amendment effective January 1, 2009. —

Laws 2008, ch. 90, § 2, amended this section effective January 1, 2009, by rewriting (a)(i) and (a)(ii); repealing (b) through (d), which related to the changing of a registered office or agent; and inserting (f).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see §

17-10-202

(a)(xix).

§ 17-10-205.
Organizational purpose.

A cooperative may be formed and organized on a cooperative plan as provided under this article to market, process, or otherwise change the form or marketability of crops, livestock and other agricultural products, including manufacturing and further processing of those products and other purposes that are necessary or convenient to facilitate the production or marketing of agricultural products by patron members and other purposes that are related to the business of the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-206.
Organizers.

A cooperative may be organized by one (1) or more organizers who shall be adult natural persons, who may act for themselves as individuals or as the agents of other entities. The organizers forming the cooperative need not be members of the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-207.
Cooperative name.

The name of a cooperative shall distinguish the cooperative upon the records in the office of the secretary of state from the name of a domestic business entity or a foreign business entity, authorized or registered to do business in this state or a name the right to which is, at the time of organization, reserved or provided for by law.

The cooperative name shall be reserved for the cooperative during its existence.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-208.
Articles of organization.

The organizers shall prepare the articles, which shall include:

The name of the cooperative;

The purpose of the cooperative;

The principal place of business for the cooperative and the name and address of its registered agent in this state;

The period of duration for the cooperative, if the duration is not to be perpetual;

The capital structure of the cooperative including a statement of the classes and relative rights, preferences, and restrictions granted to or imposed upon each class of member interests, the rights to share in profits or distributions of the cooperative, and the authority to issue member interests, which may be designated to be determined by the board;

A provision designating the voting and governance rights, including which membership interests have voting power and any limitations or restrictions on the voting power, which shall be in accordance with the provisions of this article;

A statement that patron membership interests with voting power shall be restricted to one (1) vote for each member regardless of the amount of patron membership interests held in the affairs of the cooperative or a statement describing the allocation of voting power allocated as prescribed in this article;

A statement that membership interests held by a member are transferable only with the approval of the board or as provided in the bylaws;

The names, post office addresses, and terms of office of the directors of the first board;

A statement as to how profits and losses will be allocated and cash will be distributed between patron membership interests collectively and nonpatron membership interests collectively, a statement that net income allocated to a patron membership interests as determined by the board in excess of dividends and additions to reserves shall be distributed on the basis of patronage, and that the records of the cooperative shall include the interests of patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests which may be further described in the bylaws, of any classes, and in the reserves; and

The registered address of the cooperative.

The articles shall contain the provisions in subsection (a) of this section, except that the names, post office addresses of the directors of the first board may be omitted after their successors have been elected by the members or the articles are amended in their entirety.

The articles may contain any other lawful provision.

The articles shall be signed by the organizers.

The original articles shall be filed with the secretary of state. The fee for filing the articles with the secretary of state shall be subject to the provisions of W.S.

17-16-122

.

When the articles of organization have been filed with the secretary of state and the required fee has been paid to the secretary of state, it shall be presumed that:

All conditions precedent that are required to be performed by the organizers have been complied with;

The organization of the cooperative has been chartered by the state as a separate legal entity; and

The secretary of state shall issue a certificate of organization to the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-209.
Amendment of articles.

The articles of a cooperative shall be amended as follows:

The board by majority vote shall pass a resolution stating the text of the proposed amendment. The text of the proposed amendment and an attached mail ballot, if the board has provided for a mail ballot in the resolution or alternative method approved by the board and stated in the resolution, shall be mailed or distributed with a regular or special meeting notice to each member. The notice shall designate the time and place of the meeting for the proposed amendment to be considered and voted on;

If a quorum of the members is registered as being present or represented by alternative vote at the meeting, the proposed amendment is adopted:

If approved by a majority of the votes cast; or

For a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than majority approval or other conditions for approval, the amendment is approved by a proportion of the votes cast or a number of total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

After an amendment has been adopted by the members, the amendment shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer, or assistant records officer and a copy of the amendment filed in the office of the secretary of state.

A certificate shall be prepared stating:

The vote and meeting of the board adopting a resolution of the proposed amendment;

The notice given to members of the meeting at which the amendment was adopted;

The quorum registered at the meeting; and

The vote cast adopting the amendment.

The certificate shall be signed by the chair, vice-chair, records officer or financial officer and filed with the records of the cooperative.

A majority of directors may amend the articles if the cooperative does not have any members with voting rights.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-210.
Amendment of organizational documents to be governed by this article.

A business entity organized and doing business under other statutes of this state or under the laws of other states that has or will conduct business as a cooperative may become subject to this article by amending its organizational documents to conform to the requirements of articles of organization under this article.

A business entity organized under other statutes of this state may amend its articles in the manner provided under the statute that it is governed by for the adoption of amendments to comply with the provisions of this article and file the amended articles with the secretary of state to be a cooperative governed under this article. The status of the business entity under the other statutes terminates with the filing of articles to be governed under this article.

A business entity organized under laws of other states shall amend its organizational documents in the manner required by the laws of the state where it was organized to comply with the provisions of this article. After the organizational documents are amended, the business entity shall file a certified copy of the organizational documents as amended with the secretary of state to comply with the provisions of this article with the fees and requirements prescribed for filing articles. After filing, the business entity is a cooperative in this state organized under and subject to the provisions of this article.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-211.
Existence.

The existence of a cooperative shall begin when the articles are filed with the secretary of state.

A cooperative shall have a perpetual duration unless the cooperative provides for a limited period of duration in the articles of organization.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-212.
Bylaws.

A cooperative shall have bylaws governing the cooperative’s business affairs, structure, the qualifications, classification, rights and obligations of members, and the classifications, allocations and distributions of membership interests.

The bylaws of a cooperative may be adopted or amended by the directors as provided in subsection (c) of this section, or at a regular or special members’ meeting if:

The notice of the meeting contains a statement that the bylaws or restated bylaws will be voted upon and copies are included with the notice, or copies are available upon request from the cooperative and summary statement of the proposed bylaws or amendment is included with the notice;

A quorum is registered as being present or represented by mail or alternative voting method if the mail or alternative voting method is authorized by the board; and

The bylaws or amendment is approved by a majority vote cast, or for a cooperative with articles or bylaws requiring more than majority approval or other conditions for approval, the bylaws or amendment is approved by a proportion of the vote cast or a number of the total members as required by the articles or bylaws and the conditions for approval in the articles or bylaws have been satisfied.

Until the next annual or special members’ meeting, the majority of directors may adopt and amend bylaws for the cooperative that are consistent with subsection (d) of this section which may be further amended or repealed by the members at an annual or special members’ meeting.

Bylaws may contain any provision relating to the management or regulation of the affairs of the cooperative that are not inconsistent with law or the articles, and shall include the following:

The number of directors, and the qualifications, manner of election, powers, duties, and compensation, if any, of directors;

The qualifications of members and any limitations on their number;

The manner of admission, withdrawal, suspensions, and expulsion of members;

Generally the governance rights, financial rights, assignability of governance and financial rights, and other rights, privileges and obligations of members and their membership interests, which may be further described in member control agreements.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-213.
Powers.

In addition to other powers, a cooperative as an agent or otherwise:

May perform every act and thing necessary or proper to the conduct of the cooperative’s business or the accomplishment of the purposes of the cooperative;

Has other rights, powers, or privileges granted by the laws of this state to other cooperatives, except those that are inconsistent with the express provisions of this article; and

Has the powers given in this section.

A cooperative may buy, sell, or deal in its own products, the products of the cooperative’s individual members, patrons or nonmembers, the products of another cooperative association, or of its members or patrons, or the products of another person or entity. A cooperative may negotiate the price at which the products the cooperative is selling may be sold.

A cooperative may enter into or become a party to a contract or agreement for the cooperative or for the cooperative’s individual members or patrons or between the cooperative and its members.

A cooperative may purchase and hold, lease, mortgage, encumber, sell, exchange and convey as a legal entity real estate, buildings and personal property as the business of the cooperative may require including the sale or other disposition of assets required by the business of the cooperative as determined by the board.

A cooperative may erect buildings or other structures or facilities on the cooperative’s owned or leased property or on a right-of-way legally acquired by the cooperative.

A cooperative may issue bonds or other evidence of indebtedness and may borrow money to finance the business of the cooperative.

A cooperative may make advances to the cooperative’s members or patrons on products delivered by the members or patrons to the cooperative.

A cooperative may accept deposits of money from other cooperatives, associations or members from which it is constituted.

A cooperative may loan or borrow money to or from individual members, cooperatives or associations from which it is constituted with security that it considers sufficient in dealing with the members, cooperatives, or associations.

A cooperative may purchase, acquire, hold, or dispose of the ownership interests of another business entity whether organized under the laws of this state or another state and assume all rights, interests, privileges, responsibilities and obligations arising out of the ownership interests.

A cooperative may acquire and hold ownership interests in another business entity organized under the laws of this state or another state of the United States, including a business entity organized:

As a federation of associations;

For the purpose of forming a district, state, or national marketing, sales or service agency; or

For the purpose of acquiring marketing facilities at terminal or other markets in this state or other states.

A cooperative may purchase, own, and hold ownership interests, memberships, interests in nonstock capital, evidences of indebtedness of any domestic business entity or foreign business entity when reasonably necessary or incidental to accomplish the purposes stated in the articles.

A cooperative may exercise any and all fiduciary powers in relations with members, cooperatives, associations or business entities from which it is constituted.

A cooperative may take, receive, and hold real and personal property, including the principal and interest of money or other funds and rights in a contract, in trust for any purpose not inconsistent with the purposes of the cooperative in its articles and may exercise fiduciary powers in relation to taking, receiving, and holding the real and personal property.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-10-214.
Agricultural product marketing contracts.

A cooperative and its patron member or patron may make and execute a marketing contract, requiring the patron member or patron to sell a specified portion of his agricultural product or specified commodity produced from a certain area exclusively to or through the cooperative or facility established by the cooperative.

If a sale is contracted to the cooperative, the sale shall transfer title to the product absolutely, except for a recorded lien or security interest, to the cooperative on delivery of the product or at another specified time if expressly provided in the contract. The contract may allow the cooperative to sell or resell the product of its patron member or patron with or without taking title to the product, and pay the resale price to the patron member or patron, after deducting all necessary selling, overhead and other costs and expenses, including other proper reserves and interest.

A single term of a marketing contract shall not exceed ten (10) years, but a marketing contract may be made self-renewing for periods not exceeding five (5) years each, subject to the right of either party to terminate by giving written notice of the termination during a period of the current term as specified in the contract.

The bylaws or the marketing contract, or both, may set a specific sum as liquidated damages to be paid by the patron member or patron to the cooperative for breach of any provision of the marketing contract regarding the sale or delivery or withholding of a product and may provide that the member or patron shall pay the costs, premiums for bonds, expenses and fees if an action is brought on the contract by the cooperative. The remedies for breach of contract are valid and enforceable in the courts of this state. The provisions shall be enforced as liquidated damages and are not to be considered or regarded as a penalty.

If there is a breach or threatened breach of a marketing contract by a patron member or patron, the cooperative is entitled to an injunction to prevent the further breach of the contract and to a decree of specific performance of the contract. Pending the adjudication of the action after filing a certified complaint showing the breach or threatened breach and filing a sufficient bond, the cooperative is entitled to a temporary restraining order and preliminary injunction against the patron member or patron.

Any person who knowingly induces or attempts to induce any member or patrons of a cooperative organized under this article to breach his marketing contract with the cooperative, or who maliciously and knowingly spreads false reports about the finances or management thereof, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100.00), and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), for each such offense; provided, that this section shall not apply to a bona fide creditor of such cooperative, or the agent or attorney of any such bona fide creditor, endeavoring to make collections of the indebtedness.

In addition to the penalty provided in subsection (f) of this section, the person, corporation or other entity may be liable to the cooperative for civil damages for any violation of the provisions of subsection (f) of this section. Each violation shall constitute a separate offense and is subject to the penalties in this subsection and subsection (f) of this section.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-215.
Board governs cooperative.

A cooperative shall be governed by its board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-216.
Number of directors.

The board shall have not less than three (3) directors.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-217.
Election of directors.

Directors shall be elected for the term, at the time, and in the manner provided in this section and the bylaws. A majority of the directors shall be members and at least one (1) director shall be elected exclusively by the members holding patron membership interests. The voting authority of the directors may be allocated according to allocation units or equity classifications of the cooperative provided that at least one-half (1/2) of the voting power on general matters of the cooperative shall be allocated to one (1) or more directors elected by members holding patron membership interests or in the alternative the one (1) or more directors elected by the members holding patron membership interests shall have an equal or shall not have a minority voting power on general matters of the cooperative.

Directors shall be elected at the regular members’ meeting for the terms of office prescribed in the bylaws. Except for directors elected at district meetings, all directors shall be elected at the regular members’ meeting.

For a cooperative with districts or other units, members may elect directors on a district or unit basis if provided in the bylaws. The directors may be nominated or elected at district meetings if provided in the bylaws. Directors who are nominated at district meetings shall be elected at the annual regular members’ meeting by vote of the entire membership, unless the bylaws provide that directors who are nominated at district meetings are to be elected by vote of the members of the district at the annual regular members’ meeting.

The following shall apply to alternative voting:

A member may not vote other than by their presence at a meeting for a director unless alternative voting is authorized for election of directors by the articles or bylaws;

The ballot shall be in a form prescribed by the board;

The member shall mark the ballot for the candidate chosen and mail the ballot to the cooperative in a sealed plain envelope inside another envelope bearing the member’s name, or shall vote in the alternative manner prescribed by the board;

If the ballot of the member is received by the cooperative on or before the date of the regular members’ meeting, the ballot shall be accepted and counted as the vote of the absent member.

If a member of a cooperative is not a natural person, and the bylaws do not provide otherwise, the member may appoint or elect one (1) or more natural persons to be eligible for election as a director to the board.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-218.
Filling vacancies.

If a patron member director’s position becomes vacant for a director that was elected by patron members, the board shall appoint a patron member of the cooperative to fill the director’s position until the next regular or special members’ meeting. If the vacating director was not a patron member, the board shall appoint a patron member to fill the vacant position. At the next regular or special members’ meeting, the members or patron members shall elect a director to fill the unexpired term of the vacant director’s position.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-219.
Removal of directors.

The members electing a director may remove the director at a members’ meeting for cause related to the duties of the position of director and fill the vacancy caused by the removal.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-220.
Limitation of director's liability.

A director’s personal liability to the cooperative or members for monetary damages for breach of fiduciary duty as a director may be eliminated or limited in the articles except as provided in subsection (b) of this section.

The articles may not eliminate or limit the liability of a director:

For a breach of the director’s duty of loyalty to the cooperative or its members;

For acts or omissions that are not in good faith or involve intentional misconduct or a knowing violation of law;

For a transaction from which the director derived an improper personal benefit; or

For an act or omission occurring before the date when the provision in the articles eliminating or limiting liability becomes effective.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-221.
Officers.

The board shall elect:

A chair; and

One (1) or more vice-chairs.

The board shall elect or appoint:

A records officer; and

A financial officer.

The board may elect additional officers as the articles or bylaws authorize or require.

The offices of records officer and financial officer may be combined.

The chair and first vice-chair shall be directors and members. The financial officer, records officer, and additional officers need not be directors or members.

The board may employ a chief executive officer to manage the day-to-day affairs and business of the cooperative.

Other than the chief executive officer, members may remove an officer at a members’ meeting for cause related to the duties of the position of the officer and fill the vacancy caused by the removal.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-222.
Membership interests.

The authorized amount and divisions of patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests may be increased or decreased or established or altered, in accordance with the restrictions in this article by amending the articles at a regular members’ meeting or at a special members’ meeting called for the purpose of the amendment.

Authorized membership interests may be issued on terms and conditions prescribed in the articles, bylaws, or as determined by the board. The cooperative shall disclose to any person or entity acquiring membership interests to be issued by the cooperative, the organization, capital structure and business prospects and risks of the cooperative, the nature of the governance and financial rights of the membership interest being acquired and of other classes of membership and membership interests. The cooperative shall notify all members of the membership interests being offered by the cooperative. A membership interest may not be issued until the subscription price of the membership interest has been paid for in cash or a cash equivalent or property with the agreed upon value of the property to be contributed.

The patron membership interests collectively shall have not less than fifteen percent (15%) of the cooperative’s financial rights to profit allocations and distributions.

After issuance by the cooperative, membership interests in a cooperative may only be sold or transferred with the approval of the board.

The cooperative may solicit and issue nonpatron membership interests on terms and conditions determined by the board and disclosed in the articles, bylaws or by separate disclosure to the members. Each member acquiring nonpatron membership interests shall sign a member control agreement which shall describe the rights and obligations of the member as it relates to the nonpatron membership interests, the financial and governance rights, the transferability of the nonpatron membership interests, the division and allocations of profits and losses among the membership interests and membership classes, and financial rights upon liquidation. If the bylaws do not otherwise provide for the allocation of the profits and losses between patron membership interests and nonpatron membership interests, then the allocation of profits and losses among nonpatron membership interests individually and patron membership interests collectively shall be allocated on the basis of the value of contributions to capital made according to the patron membership interests collectively and the nonpatron membership interests individually to the extent the contributions have been accepted by the cooperative. Distributions of cash or other assets of the cooperative shall be allocated among the membership interests as provided in the articles and bylaws, subject to the provisions of this article. If not otherwise provided, distributions shall be made on the basis of value of the capital contributions of the patron membership interests collectively and the nonpatron membership interests to the extent the contributions have been accepted by the cooperative.

The bylaws may provide that the cooperative or the patron members, individually or collectively, have the first privilege of purchasing the membership interests of any class of patron member’s membership interests offered for sale. The first privilege to purchase patron membership interests may be satisfied by notice to other patron members that the patron membership interests are for sale and a procedure by which patron members may proceed to attempt to purchase and acquire the patron membership interests. A patron membership interest acquired by the cooperative may be held to be reissued or may be retired and cancelled.

Subject to the provisions in the bylaws, a member may dissent from and obtain payment for the fair value of the member’s nonpatron membership interests in the cooperative if the articles or bylaws are amended in a manner that materially and adversely affects the rights and preferences of the nonpatron membership interests of the dissenting member. The dissenting member shall file a notice of intent to demand fair value of the membership interest with the records officer of the cooperative within thirty (30) days after the amendment of the bylaws and notice of the amendment to members, otherwise the right of the dissenting member to demand payment of fair value for the membership interest is deemed to be waived. If a proposed amendment of the articles or bylaws shall be approved by the members, a member who is entitled to dissent and who wishes to exercise dissenter’s rights shall file a notice to demand fair value of the membership interest with the records officer of the cooperative before the vote on the proposed action and shall not vote in favor of the proposed action, otherwise the right to demand fair value for the membership interest by the dissenting member is deemed waived. After receipt of the dissenting member’s demand notice and approval of the amendment, the cooperative has sixty (60) days to rescind the amendment or otherwise the cooperative shall remit the fair value for the one (1) member’s interest to the dissenting member by one hundred eighty (180) days after receipt of the notice. Upon receipt of the fair value for the membership interest, the member has no further member rights in the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-223.
Grouping of members.

A cooperative may group members and patron members in districts, units or another basis if and as authorized in its articles and bylaws which may include authorization for the board to determine the groupings.

The board may do things necessary to implement the use of districts or units including setting the time and place and prescribing the rules of conduct for holding meetings by districts or units to elect delegates to members’ meetings.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-224.
Member violations; liability for cooperative debts.

A member who knowingly, intentionally, or repeatedly violates a provision of the articles, bylaws, member control agreement or marketing contract with the cooperative, may be required by the board to surrender the financial rights of membership interest of any class owned by the member.

The cooperative shall refund to the member for the surrendered financial rights of membership interest the lesser of the book value or market value of the financial right of the membership interest payable in not more than seven (7) years from the date of surrender or the board may transfer all of any patron member’s financial rights to a class of financial rights held by members who are not patron members, or to a certificate of interest which carries liquidation rights on par with membership interests and is redeemed within seven (7) years after the transfer as provided in the certificate.

Membership interests required to be surrendered may be reissued or be retired and cancelled by the board.

A member who knowingly, intentionally or repeatedly violates a provision of the articles, bylaws, member control agreement, or a marketing contract, may be required by the board to surrender voting power in the cooperative.

A member is not, merely on the account of that status, personally liable for the acts, debts, liabilities, or obligations of a cooperative. A member is liable for any unpaid subscription for the membership interest, unpaid membership fees, or a debt for which the member has separately contracted with the cooperative.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.

§ 17-10-225.
Regular members' meetings.

Regular members’ meetings shall be held annually at a time determined by the board, unless otherwise provided for in the bylaws.

The regular members’ meeting shall be held at the principal place of business of the cooperative or at another conveniently located place as determined by the bylaws or the board.

The officers shall submit reports to the members at the regular members’ meeting covering the business of the cooperative for the previous fiscal year that show the condition of the cooperative at the close of the fiscal year.

All directors shall be elected at the regular members’ meeting for the terms of office prescribed in the bylaws, except for directors elected at district or unit meetings.

The cooperative shall give notice of regular members’ meetings by mailing the regular members’ meeting notice to each member at the member’s last known post office address or by other notification approved by the board and agreed to by the members. The regular members’ meeting notice shall be published or otherwise given by approved method at least two (2) weeks before the date of the meeting or mailed at least fifteen (15) days before the date of the meeting.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 144, § 2.